Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201387-219
Trade name; publication; file; failure;
effect.

Every duplicate of the registration of a trade name
shall be published by the applicant once in a newspaper of general circulation
published in the city or village where the business is to be located, or,
if there is no newspaper in the city or village, in some newspaper of general
circulation in the county. Proof of such publication shall be filed in the
office of the Secretary of State within
forty-five days from the date of registration in the office of the Secretary
of State. If proof of publication is not filed with the Secretary of State within the
forty-five days, the registration shall be canceled by the Secretary of State.

Laws 1967, c. 628, § 13, p. 2104;

Laws 2010, LB690, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB209, § 2.